District of Columbia statutes.
6-1309

Application to international organizations.

(a)

The Secretary may make § 6-1306, or any other provision of this chapter, applicable with respect to an international organization to the same extent that it is applicable with respect to a foreign mission if the Secretary determines that such application is necessary to carry out the policy set forth in § 6-1301(b) and to further the objectives set forth in § 6-1304(b).

(b)

For purposes of this section, “international organization” means:

(1)

a public international organization designated as such pursuant to the International Organizations Immunities Act (22 U.S.C. §§ 288 — 288f-4) or a public international organization created pursuant to a treaty or other international agreement as an instrument through or by which 2 or more foreign governments engage in some aspect of their conduct of international affairs; and

(2)

an official mission (other than a United States mission) to such a public international organization; including any real property of such an organization or mission and including the personnel of such an organization or mission.

Aug. 24, 1982, 96 Stat. 289, Pub. L. 97-241, § 209
This section is referenced in § 6-1302, § 6-1305, § 6-1314, and § 6-1315.
1981 Ed., § 5-1209.
For effective date of amendment made by title II of Pub. L. 97-241, Historical and Statutory Notes following § 6-1301.
The “International Organizations Immunities Act,” referred to in (b), is the Act of Dec. 29, 1945, C. 652, 59 Stat. 669, as amended, and is codified as 22 U.S.C. §§ 288—288f-4.